en: Bleak
fr: Ablette

en: Roasted cods, Baked cods
fr: Cabillauds rôtis, Cabillauds cuits au four

en: Steamed cods
fr: Cabillauds cuits à la vapeur

en: Salted boiled cod, Salted cod cooked in water
fr: Morue salée bouillie, Morue salée cuite à l'eau

en: Salted dried cod
fr: Morue salée sèche

en: Fish livers
de: Fischleber
fr: Foies de poissons
hr: Riblje jetre

en: Cod livers
de: Kabeljaulebern
fi: turskanmaksat
fr: Foies de morue, foie de morue
hr: Jetra bakalara
nl: Kabeljauwlevers

en: Canned cod liver
fr: Foie de morue appertisé, Foie de morue en conserve

en: Jellyfish
de: Quallen
fr: Méduse
hr: Meduza
ja: クラゲ
nl: Kwallen
ro: Meduză
tr: Denizanası

en: Mollusc, Mollusk
de: Molluske
es: Molusco
fi: nilviäiset
fr: Mollusques, Coquillages
hr: Mekušac
it: Molluschi
ja: 軟体動物
nl: Weekdieren
pt: Moluscos
ro: Moluscă
ru: Моллюски

en: Frozen Mollusc, Frozen mollusk
fr: Mollusques surgelés, Coquillages surgelés

en: Abalone, Ormer, Sea ear
fr: Ormeau
hr: Puzlatka
ja: アワビ, 鮑
zh: 鲍鱼

en: Cooked abalone, cooked ormer, cooked sea ear
fr: Ormeau cuit

en: Cockles
de: Herzmuscheln
fr: Coques
hr: Kukuljice
ja: ザルガイ
nl: Kokkels

en: Scallop, Noix de Saint-Jacques
es: Vieira
fr: Noix de Saint-Jacques
hr: Jakobova kapica
ja: ホタテ貝
nl: Scallop

en: Boiled clam, Clam cooked in water
fr: Palourde bouillie, Palourde cuite à l'eau, Praire bouillie, Praire cuite à l'eau, Clam bouilli, Clam cuit à l'eau

en: Clam
fr: Palourde, Praire, Clam
hr: Školjka
ja: アサリ

en: Cooked whelk
fr: Bulot cuit, Buccin cuit

en: Whelk
fr: Bulot, Buccin
hr: Kotač
ja: ツブ

en: Mussels
de: Muscheln
es: Mejillones
fi: simpukat
fr: Moules
hr: Dagnje
it: Mitili, cozze
ja: ムール貝
nl: Mosselen
ru: Мидии
tr: Midye